Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-934
False Medicaid Claims Act; act, how cited.

Sections 68-934 to 68-947 shall be known and may be cited as the False Medicaid Claims Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 67;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1037.01;

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1073;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 34;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 21.